Arkansas, session 2025, SB150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 21-5-406(e)(3), concerning the authority of
the Director of the Employee Benefits Division, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(F) The director may cooperate with the United States
Government in matters of mutual concern pertaining to federally funded
programs related to the Employee Benefits Division, including without
limitation Medicare.






*LGL051*
01/30/2025 12:00:06 PM LGL051